Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.470

Funding, refunding bonds.

The metropolitan council may, by resolution, without submitting the matter to the voters of the metropolitan municipal corporation, provide for the issuance of funding or refunding general obligation bonds to refund any outstanding general obligation bonds or any part thereof at maturity, or before maturity if they are by their terms or by other agreement subject to prior redemption, with the right in the metropolitan council to combine various series and issues of the outstanding bonds by a single issue of funding or refunding bonds, and to issue refunding bonds to pay any redemption premium payable on the outstanding bonds being refunded. The funding or refunding general obligation bonds shall, except as specifically provided in this section, be issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter with respect to general obligation bonds.

The metropolitan council may, by resolution, without submitting the matter to the voters of the metropolitan municipal corporation, provide for the issuance of funding or refunding revenue bonds to refund any outstanding revenue bonds or any part thereof at maturity, or before maturity if they are by their terms or by agreement subject to prior redemption, with the right in the metropolitan council to combine various series and issues of the outstanding bonds by a single issue of refunding bonds, and to issue refunding bonds to pay any redemption premium payable on the outstanding bonds being refunded. The funding or refunding revenue bonds shall be payable only out of a special fund created out of the gross revenue of the particular utility, and shall be a valid claim only as against such special fund and the amount of the revenue of the utility pledged to the fund. The funding or refunding revenue bonds shall, except as specifically provided in this section, be issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter with respect to revenue bonds.

The metropolitan council may exchange the funding or refunding bonds at par for the bonds which are being funded or refunded, or it may sell them in such manner, at such price and at such rate or rates of interest as it deems for the best interest of the metropolitan municipal corporation.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 40; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 18; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.470. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 47.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.